Maine, session 132, LD967.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Economic and Community Development 0069
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to continue and make permanent one Public Service
Coordinator I position to support the Career Exploration Program effective July 1, 2026.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $128,892
All Other $0 $10,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $138,892